Illinois, session 104th, SB3952.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Transportation Network Providers Act is 5amended by changing Sections 5, 10, 20, 25, and 30 and by 6adding Section 31 as follows: 7    (625 ILCS 57/5)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on September 1, 2028)9    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act: 10    "Customer" means a person or entity that requests and 11receives TNC services, whether as a passenger or as a 12recipient of delivered goods. 13    "Transportation network company" or "TNC" means an entity 14operating in this State that uses a digital network or 15software application service to connect customers passengers 16to transportation network company services provided by 17transportation network company drivers. A TNC is not deemed to 18own, control, operate, or manage the vehicles used by TNC 19drivers, and is not a taxicab association or a for-hire 20vehicle owner.21    "Transportation network company driver" or "TNC driver" 22means an individual who operates a motor vehicle that is:23        (1) owned, leased, or otherwise authorized for use by   SB3952- 2 -LRB104 18307 LNS 31747 b1    the individual;2        (2) not a taxicab or for-hire public passenger 3    vehicle; and4        (3) used to provide transportation network company 5    services.6    "Transportation network company services" or "TNC 7services" means transportation of a customer passenger between 8points chosen by the customer or transportation of goods from 9a point designated by the customer or the TNC, including, but 10not limited to, a retail store, warehouse, fulfillment center, 11or restaurant, to a point chosen by the customer, passenger 12and prearranged with a TNC driver by the customer or the TNC 13through the use of a TNC digital network or software 14application. TNC services include both passenger rideshare and 15delivery services for consumer goods, including, but not 16limited to, groceries, retail items, prepared food, and 17packages. TNC services shall begin when a TNC driver accepts a 18request for transportation or delivery of goods received 19through the TNC's digital network or software application 20service, continue while the TNC driver transports the customer 21or goods passenger in the TNC driver's vehicle, and end when 22the customer passenger exits the TNC driver's vehicle or the 23goods are delivered at the point specified by the customer or 24the TNC. TNC service is not a taxicab, for-hire vehicle, or 25street hail service. TNC services do not include freight 26transportation, commercial trucking, or services provided by   SB3952- 3 -LRB104 18307 LNS 31747 b1employees of the entity rather than independent contractors. 2(Source: Reenacted by P.A. 101-660, eff. 4-2-21; revised 36-27-25.) 4    (625 ILCS 57/10)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on September 1, 2028)6    Sec. 10. Insurance. 7    (a) Transportation network companies and participating TNC 8drivers shall comply with the automobile liability insurance 9requirements of this Section as required.10    (b) The following automobile liability insurance 11requirements shall apply from the moment a participating TNC 12driver logs on to the transportation network company's digital 13network or software application until the TNC driver accepts a 14request to transport a customer or goods passenger, and from 15the moment the TNC driver completes the transaction on the 16digital network or software application or the ride or 17delivery is complete, whichever is later, until the TNC driver 18either accepts another ride request on the digital network or 19software application or logs off the digital network or 20software application:21        (1) Automobile liability insurance shall be in the 22    amount of at least $50,000 for death and personal injury 23    per person, $100,000 for death and personal injury per 24    incident, and $25,000 for property damage.25        (2) Contingent automobile liability insurance in the   SB3952- 4 -LRB104 18307 LNS 31747 b1    amounts required in paragraph (1) of this subsection (b) 2    shall be maintained by a transportation network company 3    and provide coverage in the event a participating TNC 4    driver's own automobile liability policy excludes coverage 5    according to its policy terms or does not provide at least 6    the limits of coverage required in paragraph (1) of this 7    subsection (b).8    (c) The following automobile liability insurance 9requirements shall apply from the moment a TNC driver accepts 10a ride or delivery request on the transportation network 11company's digital network or software application until the 12TNC driver completes the transaction on the digital network or 13software application or until the ride or delivery is 14complete, whichever is later: 15        (1) Automobile liability insurance shall be primary 16    and in the amount of $1,000,000 for death, personal 17    injury, and property damage. The requirements for the 18    coverage required by this paragraph (1) may be satisfied 19    by any of the following: 20            (A) automobile liability insurance maintained by a 21        participating TNC driver; 22            (B) automobile liability company insurance 23        maintained by a transportation network company; or 24            (C) any combination of subparagraphs (A) and (B). 25        (2) Insurance coverage provided under this subsection 26    (c) shall also provide for uninsured motorist coverage and   SB3952- 5 -LRB104 18307 LNS 31747 b1    underinsured motorist coverage in the amount of $50,000 2    from the moment a customer passenger enters the vehicle of 3    a participating TNC driver, the TNC driver receives the 4    goods requested by the customer at the designated pickup 5    point, or the TNC driver begins en route to the designated 6    pickup point after accepting the request until the 7    customer passenger exits the vehicle or the delivery is 8    completed. 9        (3) The insurer, in the case of insurance coverage 10    provided under this subsection (c), shall have the duty to 11    defend and indemnify the insured. 12        (4) Coverage under an automobile liability insurance 13    policy required under this subsection (c) shall not be 14    dependent on a personal automobile insurance policy first 15    denying a claim nor shall a personal automobile insurance 16    policy be required to first deny a claim.17    (d) In every instance when automobile liability insurance 18maintained by a participating TNC driver to fulfill the 19insurance obligations of this Section has lapsed or ceased to 20exist, the transportation network company shall provide the 21coverage required by this Section beginning with the first 22dollar of a claim.23    (e) This Section shall not limit the liability of a 24transportation network company arising out of an automobile 25crash involving a participating TNC driver in any action for 26damages against a transportation network company for an amount   SB3952- 6 -LRB104 18307 LNS 31747 b1above the required insurance coverage.2    (f) The transportation network company shall disclose in 3writing to TNC drivers, as part of its agreement with those TNC 4drivers, the following: 5        (1) the insurance coverage and limits of liability 6    that the transportation network company provides while the 7    TNC driver uses a vehicle in connection with a 8    transportation network company's digital network or 9    software application; and 10        (2) that the TNC driver's own insurance policy may not 11    provide coverage while the TNC driver uses a vehicle in 12    connection with a transportation network company digital 13    network depending on its terms.14    (g) An insurance policy required by this Section may be 15placed with an admitted Illinois insurer, or with an 16authorized surplus line insurer under Section 445 of the 17Illinois Insurance Code; and is not subject to any restriction 18or limitation on the issuance of a policy contained in Section 19445a of the Illinois Insurance Code.20    (h) Any insurance policy required by this Section shall 21satisfy the financial responsibility requirement for a motor 22vehicle under Sections 7-203 and 7-601 of the Illinois Vehicle 23Code.24    (i) If a transportation network company's insurer makes a 25payment for a claim covered under comprehensive coverage or 26collision coverage, the transportation network company shall   SB3952- 7 -LRB104 18307 LNS 31747 b1cause its insurer to issue the payment directly to the 2business repairing the vehicle, or jointly to the owner of the 3vehicle and the primary lienholder on the covered vehicle. 4(Source: P.A. 101-660, eff. 4-2-21; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23.) 5    (625 ILCS 57/20)6    (Section scheduled to be repealed on September 1, 2028)7    Sec. 20. Non-discrimination. 8    (a) The TNC shall adopt and notify TNC drivers of a policy 9of non-discrimination on the basis of destination, race, 10color, national origin, religious belief or affiliation, sex, 11disability, age, sexual orientation, or gender identity with 12respect to customers passengers and potential customers 13passengers.14    (b) TNC drivers shall comply with all applicable laws 15regarding non-discrimination against customers passengers or 16potential customers passengers on the basis of destination, 17race, color, national origin, religious belief or affiliation, 18sex, disability, age, sexual orientation, or gender identity.19    (c) TNC drivers shall comply with all applicable laws 20relating to accommodation of service animals.21    (d) A TNC shall not impose additional charges for 22providing services to persons with physical disabilities 23because of those disabilities.24    (e) A TNC shall provide customers passengers an 25opportunity to indicate whether they require a wheelchair   SB3952- 8 -LRB104 18307 LNS 31747 b1accessible vehicle. If a TNC cannot arrange 2wheelchair-accessible TNC service in any instance, it shall 3direct the customer passenger to an alternate provider of 4wheelchair-accessible service, if available.5    (f) If a unit of local government has requirements for 6licensed chauffeurs not to discriminate in providing service 7in under-served areas, TNC drivers participating in TNC 8services within that unit of local government shall be subject 9to the same non-discrimination requirements for providing 10service in under-served areas. 11(Source: Reenacted by P.A. 101-660, eff. 4-2-21.) 12    (625 ILCS 57/25)13    (Section scheduled to be repealed on September 1, 2028)14    Sec. 25. Safety. 15    (a) The TNC shall implement a zero tolerance policy on the 16use of drugs or alcohol while a TNC driver is providing TNC 17services or is logged into the TNC's digital network but is not 18providing TNC services.19    (b) The TNC shall provide notice of the zero tolerance 20policy on its website, as well as procedures to report a 21complaint about a driver with whom a customer passenger was 22matched and whom the customer passenger reasonably suspects 23was under the influence of drugs or alcohol during the course 24of the trip.25    (c) Upon receipt of a customer's passenger's complaint   SB3952- 9 -LRB104 18307 LNS 31747 b1alleging a violation of the zero tolerance policy, the TNC 2shall immediately suspend the TNC driver's access to the TNC's 3digital platform, and shall conduct an investigation into the 4reported incident. The suspension shall last the duration of 5the investigation.6    (d) The TNC shall require that any motor vehicle that a TNC 7driver will use to provide TNC services meets vehicle safety 8and emissions requirements for a private motor vehicle in this 9State.10    (e) TNCs or TNC drivers are not common carriers, contract 11carriers or motor carriers, as defined by applicable State 12law, nor do they provide taxicab or for-hire vehicle service. 13This subsection (e) is inoperative on and after January 1, 142024. 15(Source: P.A. 103-527, eff. 8-11-23.) 16    (625 ILCS 57/30)17    (Section scheduled to be repealed on September 1, 2028)18    Sec. 30. Operational. 19    (a) A TNC may charge a fare for the services provided to 20customers passengers; provided that, if a fare is charged, the 21TNC shall disclose to customers passengers the fare 22calculation method on its website or within the software 23application service.24    (b) The TNC shall provide customers passengers with the 25applicable rates being charged and the option to receive an   SB3952- 10 -LRB104 18307 LNS 31747 b1estimated fare before the customer passenger enters the TNC 2driver's vehicle or the delivery is requested.3    (c) The TNC's software application or website shall 4display a picture of the TNC driver, and the license plate 5number of the motor vehicle utilized for providing the TNC 6service before the customer passenger enters the TNC driver's 7vehicle.8    (d) Within a reasonable period of time following the 9completion of a trip, a TNC shall transmit an electronic 10receipt to the customer passenger that lists:11        (1) the origin and destination of the trip;12        (2) the total time and distance of the trip; and13        (3) an itemization of the total fare paid, if any.14    (e) Dispatches for TNC services shall be made only to 15eligible TNC drivers under Section 15 of this Act who are 16properly licensed under State law and local ordinances 17addressing these drivers if applicable.18    (f) A taxicab may accept a request for transportation 19received through a TNC's digital network or software 20application service, and may charge a fare for those services 21that is similar to those charged by a TNC.22(Source: Reenacted by P.A. 101-660, eff. 4-2-21.) 23    (625 ILCS 57/31 new)24    Sec. 31. Applicability. The changes made by this 25amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly apply to all TNC   SB3952- 11 -LRB104 18307 LNS 31747 b1services, including delivery, upon the effective date of this 2amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 3    (625 ILCS 57/34 rep.)4    Section 10. The Transportation Network Providers Act is 5amended by repealing Section 34.